Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-217 Stay of proceedings; reopening
default judgments. All proceedings in which the insolvent insurer is a
party in any court in this State shall be stayed one-hundred eighty days from
the date an order of liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation is final to
permit proper legal action by the association on any matters germane to its
powers or duties. As to judgment under any decision, order, verdict, or
finding based on default the association may apply to have such judgment set
aside by the same court that made such judgment and shall be permitted to
defend against such suit on the merits. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2012, c
250, §12]

Note

The 2012 amendment shall not apply to any proceedings in
which a member insurer is placed under an order of liquidation prior to July 1,
2012. L 2012, c 250, §15.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next